Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6089.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4-1-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 4-1 entitled "Cruelty to
Animals" is hereby amended to read as follows:
4-1-9. Animal fighting.
Any person who causes or encourages the fighting of any bird, dog, or animal with any
other bird, dog, or animal, or keeps or maintains any place for the fighting of birds, dogs, or animals,
or who knowingly permits, or suffers, any fight to be had on his or her premises or on premises
under his or her control, or makes any bet or lays any wager of any kind upon the result of that
fight, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding
two (2) years, or both, for the first offense, and for a second and any subsequent offense shall be
fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or
be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) five (5) years, or both. In addition, every person convicted of
a first offense shall be required to perform twenty (20) hours of community service. Every person
convicted of a subsequent offense shall be required to perform fifty (50) hours of community
service. The community service penalty shall not be suspended or deferred.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002380/SUB A
========